Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 29. Public Property and Supplies
Executive Order No. 29-29
(No. 09-01) [Transfer of parcel of land from the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the Town of Colchester, County of Chittenden and State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings
and General Services, State of Vermont, has become and is no longer necessary for purposes of the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation, desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes;

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, MD, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services to the jurisdiction and
control of the Agency of Transportation for its purposes the following described land and premises, to wit:

Being part of the same land and premises acquired by the State of Vermont from Arbortech Inc. by Warranty Deed dated July 15, 1998, and recorded in Book 293 at Pages 226-229 of the Town of Colchester Land Records. The parcels are more particularly described
as follows:

Parcel A

A parcel of land located in the Town of Colchester, County of Chittenden, State of Vermont, and more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at an iron pipe found located in the northwest corner of said property, said iron pipe found also being located on the easterly right-of-way of U.S. Route 7, and on the Colchester-Milton Town Line; thence proceeding from the aforementioned iron
pipe found S 62°-59´-48" E for a distance of five hundred four and eighty hundredths feet (504.80´) to an iron pipe found; thence proceeding from said iron pipe found S 62°-45´-16" E for a distance of two hundred five and eighty nine
hundredths feet (205.89´) to an iron pipe found; thence proceeding from said iron pipe found S 0°-18´-22" W for a distance of four hundred thirty and sixty eight hundredths feet (430.68´) to an iron pipe found; thence proceeding from
said iron pipe found N 89°-51´-46" W for a distance of four hundred sixty five and ninety two hundredths feet (465.92´) to an unmonumented point; thence proceeding from said unmonumented point N 0°-08´-14" E for a distance of four
hundred and zero hundredths feet (400.00´) to an unmonumented point; thence proceeding from said unmonumented point S 89°-51´-46" E for a distance of forty and zero hundredths feet (40.00´) to an unmonumented point; thence proceeding
from said unmonumented point N 0°-08´-14" E one hundred thirty five and zero hundredths feet (135.00´) to an unmonumented point; thence proceeding from said unmonumented point N 89°-51´-46" W for a distance of two hundred forty and
forty six hundredths feet (240.46´) to an unmonumented point located on the easterly right-of-way of U.S. Route 7; thence proceeding from the aforementioned unmonumented point in and along the easterly right-of-way of U.S. Route 7
on a curve having a radius of one thousand three hundred ninety nine and sixty nine hundredths feet (R=1399.69´) and a length of two hundred twenty and forty three hundredths feet (L=220.43´) to the point or place of beginning.

Said parcel contains 6.53 acres.

Parcel B

Beginning at an iron pipe found on the easterly right-of-way of US Route 7, and iron pipe found is also the northwesterly property corner of Arbortech, Inc. so called; thence proceeding from the aforementioned iron pipe found N 2°-34´-43" W in and along
the easterly right-of-way of US Route 7 for a distance of three hundred thirteen and ninety three hundredths feet (313.93´) to an iron pipe found; thence proceeding from said iron pipe found N 2°-34´-43" W in and along the easterly
right-of-way of US Route 7 for a distance of thirty four and fifty seven hundredths feet (34.57´) to an unmonumented point; thence proceeding from said unmonumented point in and along the easterly right-of-way of US Route 7 on a curve
having a radius of one thousand three hundred ninety nine and sixty nine hundredths feet (R=1399.69´) and a length of one hundred eighty seven and zero four hundredths feet (L=187.04´) to an unmonumented point; thence proceeding from
said unmonumented point S 89°-51´-46" E for a distance of two hundred forty and forty six hundredths feet (240.46´) to an unmonumented point; thence proceeding from said unmonumented point S 0°-08´-14" W for a distance of one hundred
thirty five and zero hundredths feet (135.00´) to an unmonumented point; thence proceeding from said unmonumented point N 89°-51´-46" W for a distance of forty and zero hundredths feet (40.00´) to an unmonumented point; thence proceeding
S 0°-08´-14" W for a distance of four hundred and zero hundredths feet (400.00´) to an unmonumented point; thence proceeding from said unmonumented point N 89°-51´-46" W for a distance of one hundred eighty five and zero hundredths
feet (185.00´) to the point or place of beginning.

Said parcel contains 2.53 acres.

Parcels A & B are depicted on mylar slide #355, filed in the Colchester Land Records on February 2, 2001.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated October 5, 2001.

Executive Order No. 29-30
(No. 06-02) [Transfer of Certain Lands and Rights of the Agency of Transportation, located in the Town of Guilford, to the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forest, Parks, and Recreation.

WHEREAS, certain lands and rights hereinafter described and located in the Town of Guilford, County of Windham, and State of Vermont, and known as the Guilford Welcome Center, are presently under the jurisdiction and control of the State of Vermont’s
Agency of Transportation; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires to transfer to the Agency of Natural Resources certain land and rights regarding mitigation for impact upon a deer wintering area in accordance with a Memorandum of Agreement dated April 4, 1996; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources will, upon transfer, be responsible for the management of a designated deer wintering habitat area and associated forested habitat buffer zone.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Howard Dean, M.D., by the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forest, Parks, and Recreation, lands and rights of the Agency of Transportation, located
in the Town of Guilford and being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation by Victoria George by Warranty Deed dated March 13, 1996, which is recorded in Book 87, Page 17 of the Town of Guilford Land Records, and being more particularly
described as follows:

Being a parcel of land consisting of 41.34 acres, more or less, of which 25.23 acres is designated as deer wintering habitat area and 16.11 acres is designated as a forested habitat buffer zone. The parcel of land is shown on a plat entitled “State of
Vermont Agency of Transportation, Wildlife Habitat at Guilford Welcome Center, Date of Survey: May, 2001”, and which plat is dated April 16, 2002 and attached hereto and made a part hereof.

The State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation reserves the right to maintain or replace a fence and drainage structures necessary for the Welcome Center, located on the land to be transferred herein.

This transfer is subject to conditions stated in the Memorandum of Agreement between the Agency of Transportation and the Agency of Natural Resources, dated April 4, 1996.

Dated June 27, 2002.

Executive Order No. 29-31
(No. 04-03) [Transfer of Land from Agency of Transportation to Agency of Natural Resources in Clarendon.

WHEREAS, certain land hereinafter described and located in the Town of Clarendon, County of Rutland, and State of Vermont, is presently under the jurisdiction and control of the State of Vermont Agency of Transportation; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires to transfer to the Agency of Natural Resources certain land no longer needed for transportation purposes; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources has requested this land be transferred to it in order to provide a parking area and pedestrian path to access the swimming area in the “Lower Clarendon Gorge.”

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, land of the Agency of Transportation, located in the
Town of Clarendon and being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises acquired by the State of Vermont as part of the original US Route 7 which came into the State Highway System on April 1, 1931 and part of the segment of State Highway discontinued in accordance with 19 V.S.A. Sections
10 (14) and 771; such discontinuance is dated August 19, 2002 and is recorded in Book 108, Pages 119-126 of the Land Records of the Town of Clarendon, being further described as follows, viz:

Beginning at a point in the centerline of the former U.S. Route 7 located on the east side of the present U.S. Route 7 constructed as Highway Project Wallingford-Clarendon AP 019-2 (2), said point being located in the westerly property line of land now
or formerly owned by James H. Byrne;

thence continuing in the above referenced centerline and property line the following courses and distances:

S 05° 45" W 113.3 feet;

S 11° 18" 45´ W 393.6 feet;

S 13° 10" 50´ W 264.3 feet;

S 26° 17" 20´ W 182.2 feet;

S 28° 06" 20´ W 218.2 feet;

The above centerline is as shown on a survey plat dated September 2001 prepared by Tinker Surveys entitled, “Survey of Lands of James H. Byrne, Mill River Lower Gorge Area,” filed on January 15, 2002 in the office of the Town Clerk of the Town of Clarendon.

The land being conveyed is located between the above centerline and a line located 24.75 feet westerly from and parallel to the centerline.

This transfer is subject to conditions stated in the Memorandum of Agreement between the Agency of Transportation and the Agency of Natural Resources, dated March 19, 2003.

Dated May 6, 2003

Executive Order No. 29-32
(No. 05-03) [Transfer of Land from Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services to Agency of Transportation in Waitsfield.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the Town of Waitsfield, County of Washington and State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the State of Vermont, Agency of Administration,
Department of Buildings and General Services, has become and is no longer necessary for purposes of the Department of Buildings and General Services; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation, desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes;

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency
of Transportation for its purposes the following described land and premises, to wit:

Being all the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Warranty Deed of Patrick J. Collins dated February 12, 1997 and recorded in Book 77, Pages 59-64 of the Waitsfield Land Records.

Being part of all and the same land and premises conveyed to Patrick J. Collins by Judgment and Decree of Foreclosure in the matter of Patrick J. Collins v. Robert C. Dowdell, Sandra L. Dowdell, Mariden Corporation d/b/a Solid Seal Systems, National Seal
Company and Everett J. Prescott, Inc., Washington Superior Court, Docket No. 536-9-94 Wncvf dated March 20, 1995 and Certificate of Non-Redemption, in the above mentioned matter, dated April 28, 1995 and recorded May 3, 1995 in Book
10, Pages 645-650 of the Waitsfield Land Records.

The land and premises are further described as being part of all and the same land and premises conveyed to Robert C. Dowdell and Sandra L. Dowdell by Warranty Deed of Patrick J. Collins and Richard Mazzella dated September 4, 1987 and recorded in Book
53, Pages 493-494 of the Waitsfield Land Records.

The land and premises are further described as Lot #3 of Valley Park Subdivision as shown on a survey map entitled “Valley Park Subdivision” dated October 31, 1995 prepared by Gregory F. DuBois which survey is recorded on Slide #172 in the Waitsfield
Land Records and more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at an iron rod found at the southwesterly corner of Lot #3, thence;

N 40° 31" 25´ W 279.95 feet to a calculated point, thence;

N 50° 42" 18´ E 27.09 feet to a calculated point, thence;

N 44° 32" 06´ W 387.45 feet to a calculated point, thence;

N 41° 11" 06´ E 26.79 feet to a calculated point, thence;

N 41° 11" 06´ E 57.82 feet to a calculated point, thence;

N 19° 38" 00´ E 316.68 feet to a calculated point, thence;

S 40° 54" 00´ E 843.48 feet to an iron rod found, thence;

S 50° 42" 21´ W 364.02 feet to the point of beginning.

There was included in said Warranty Deed of Patrick J. Collins dated February 12, 1997 and recorded in Book 77, Pages 59-64 of the Waitsfield Land Records a fifty foot wide right-of-way and easement in common over Lot 1 for the benefit of Lots 2 and 3
for all forms of transportation, utility and transmission purposes as shown on the above referenced survey map. Unless otherwise agreed, maintenance and repair of said right-of-way shall be shared equally.

Said conveyance of Patrick J. Collins includes a right-of-way and easement for a sewer line over Lot 1 and to an existing and approved common septic system located on Lot 1 to be shared by Lots l, 2 and 3 (Lot 2 subject to state and local approval). By
acceptance of this deed, the lot owners herein agree to pay the costs of maintaining and repairing the common septic system and appurtenant facilities. The easements provided for herein shall be subject to all state permit requirements
and neither the Grantors herein nor the Grantees herein nor their respective heirs, successors or assigns, shall do anything in the easement areas herein provided for, which shall in any way infringe upon the use of the land for the
septic system herein provided for. The easement areas included herein shall include sufficient lands surrounding the septic system and appurtenant facilities so that necessary construction, maintenance and repair work can be carried
out, all work to be done in a good and workmanlike manner. Access to the easement areas shall be over Lot 1 for any construction, maintenance or repair of the septic system easement areas and appurtenant facilities.

Maintenance of any common elements of the common septic system shall be shared equally by the users thereof. Lot owners shall be individually responsible for any portions and elements of said system which are not shared and are individually owned, and
which shall be individually maintained.

Said conveyance of Patrick J. Collins includes an undivided one-third interest in an existing drilled well located on Lot 1 to be shared by Lots 1, 2 and 3 (Lot 2 subject to state and local approval) including waterline easements for the purpose of supplying
an adequate water supply to Lot 3 to comply with the requirements of Water Supply and Wastewater Disposal Permit WW-5-0327 dated October 22, 1991 and any amendments thereto and Subdivision Permit EC-5-2534 dated July 12, 1995 and including
the right to enter upon Lot 1 to construct and maintain Lot 3’s portion of the water distribution system. The owner of Lot 1 shall be responsible for maintaining and repairing said well. Lot owners shall be individually responsible
for any portions and elements of said system which are not shared and are individually owned, and which shall be individually maintained.

Also included in said conveyance of Patrick J. Collins is the replacement easement as contained in the Easement Deed of Robert C. Dowdell and Sandra L. Dowdell to Patrick J. Collins dated February l, 1995 and recorded February 16, 1995 in Book 71, Pages
269-271 of the Waitsfield Land Records for the benefit of Lots 1, 2 and 3.

Subject to Land Use Permit 5W0530 recorded April 22, 1979 in Book 33, Pages 296-297, 5W0530-1 recorded in Book 40, Pages 439-440, 5W0530-2 recorded in Book 61, Page 197-200, 5W0530-3 Revised recorded in Book 73, Page 44-46, 5W0530-5 recorded in Book 75,
Page 492-494, Deferral of Permit DE-5-2917 recorded July 17, 1995 in Book 72, Pages 517-518, Water Supply and Wastewater Disposal Permits WW- 0629 recorded October 25, 1995 in Book 73, Page 355 and WW-5-0327 recorded October 25, 1995
in Book 73, Page 354 and SW-1-1215 recorded October 25, 1995 in Book 73, Pages 356-358, all in the Waitsfield Land Records. And also subject to Waitsfield Zoning Board of Adjustment Permit No. 2011.

Subject to and with the benefit of all rights, easements, restrictions and rights-of-way of record.

Reference is hereby made to the above-mentioned Deed, the Certificate of Non-Redemption and their records and to the Waitsfield Land Records for a more particular description of the land and premises.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated June 16, 2003.

Executive Order No. 29-33
(No. 06-03) [Transfer of Land from Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services to Agency of Transportation in Brandon.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the Town of Brandon, County of Rutland and State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the State of Vermont, Agency of Administration, Department
of Buildings and General Services, has become and is no longer necessary for purposes of the Department of State Buildings and General Services; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation, desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes;

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency
of Transportation for its purposes the following described land and premises, to wit:

Being all the same land and premises conveyed by the Brandon Industrial Corporation to the State of Vermont by Limited Warranty Deed dated May 9, 1997 and recorded in the Land Records of the Town of Brandon at Book 128, Pages 210-212.

Also being a portion of the lands and premises conveyed by the State of Vermont to Brandon Industrial Corporation by Warranty Deed dated June 30, 1993 and recorded in the Land Records of the Town of Brandon at Book 114, Pages 350-352 and being more particularly
described as follows:

Beginning at a point marked (or to be marked) by a capped rebar, which said point marks the northeasterly corner of said lands and premises conveyed by said State of Vermont to said Brandon Industrial Corporation and the northeasterly corner of the lands
and premises hereby conveyed, which said point is located in the supposed westerly line of the right of way of State Aid Highway No. 7 (the Arnold District Road, so-called);

thence proceeding in and along the supposed westerly line of the right of way of said State Aid Highway No. 7 S 10° 22" 08´ E a distance of 360 feet to a point marked (or to be marked) by a capped rebar, which said point marks the southeast corner of
the lands and premises hereby conveyed, which said point is located in the northerly line of a road or roadway (the “Park Drive”) constructed or to be constructed in the Edward K. Denecke Industrial Park, Brandon, Vermont;

thence, proceeding in and along the northerly line of said Park Drive the following four courses and distances: S 79° 37" 52´ W a distance of 198.03 feet to a point; S 83° 43" 14´ W a distance of 91.41 feet; thence turning to the right in an arc with
a radius of 318.19 feet a distance of 58.19 feet; thence N 68° 41" 52´ W a distance of 85.19 feet to a point marked (or to be marked) by a capped rebar, which said point marks the southwest corner of the lands and premises hereby conveyed;

thence, proceeding N 18° 00" 27´ E a distance of 444.86 feet to a point marked (or to be marked) by a capped rebar, which said point is located in the line of lands now or formerly of Barbarise;

thence, S 72° 09" 37´ E a distance of 229.59 feet to the point and place of beginning.

The parcel of land described above is said to contain 3.13 1 acres and is denominated Lot B on a plan by Bruno Associates, Inc., P.C. entitled “Lot Layout Plan for Brandon Industrial Corp. in Brandon, Vermont, scale 1 inch equals 150 feet, dated September
11, 1996”.

The within conveyance is made subject to the sewer and water easements, the pump station and easements, and all other common elements, and the rights of others therein, shown on said Lot Layout Plan. The within conveyance also is made subject to the following:

The Declaration of Protective Covenants for the Edward K. Denecke Industrial Park, Brandon, Vermont recorded in the Land Records of the Town of Brandon at Book 125, Page 610, as modified by the Modification to Declaration of Protective Covenants for Vermont
Tubbs, Inc., dated May 21, 1996 and recorded in the Land Records of the Town of Brandon at Book 126, Page 30;

State of Vermont, Subdivision Permit No. EC-1-1329-1, dated June 28, 1996;

State of Vermont, Subdivision Permit No. EC-1-1329-2, dated June 28, 1996; which, by its terms, supersedes Subdivision Permit No. EC-1-1329 dated March 4, 1992;

State of Vermont Subdivision Permit No. E.C.-1-1329-3, dated September 11, 1996;

Land Use (Act 250) Permit No. 1R0712, as amended.

Together with the right, in common with others, to use said Park Drive, the sewer and water lines and easements, the pump station and easements, and all other common elements, now existing or to be constructed, of, in and a part of said Edward K. Denecke
Industrial Park and subject also to the rights of others to use all of same in common with the Brandon Industrial Corporation.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated June 16, 2003.

Executive Order No. 29-34
(No. 07-03) [Transfer of Land from Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services to Agency of Transportation in Ludlow.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the Town of Ludlow, County of Windsor and State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the State of Vermont, Agency of Administration, Department
of Buildings and General Services, has become and is no longer necessary for purposes of the Department of Buildings and General Services; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation, desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes;

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency
of Transportation for its purposes the following described land and premises, to wit:

Being all and the same lands and premises as conveyed to the State of Vermont by Warranty Deed of Michael G. Rowe and Donna J. Rowe, dated May 10, 1995, and recorded in Book 155, Pages 24-25 of the Ludlow Land Records.

Reference is hereby made to a survey entitled, “Survey of Lands of State of Vermont”, prepared by Courcelle Surveying Co. and dated, Sept. 9, 2002, and recorded on October 8, 2002, in File No. 164C of the Ludlow Land Records, and in said survey said land
and premises are more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at an iron pin set in the northwesterly line of Rt. 100, said pin marks the northeast corner of lands of Roger Danyew, and the southeast corner of the herein described parcel.

Thence proceeding along the northerly line of said Danyew in the following courses:

N 35°-29"-30´ W, a distance of 64.07 ft. to an iron pipe;

N 27°-31"-15´ W, following a stonewall, a distance of 92.19 ft. to an iron pin set;

S 58°-07"-30´ W, following a stonewall, a distance of 63.76 ft. to an iron pipe found;

N 53°-46"-30´ W, a distance of 506.11 ft. to an iron pin set in a stonewall, said pin marks the northwest corner of said Danyew, the southwest corner of the herein described parcel and the easterly line of lands now or formerly J.P. Carrara & Sons.

Thence proceeding along the east line of said Carrara, marked by a stonewall, in the following courses:

N 29°-23"-45´ E, a distance of 190.35 ft. to a point;

N 42°-47"-45´ of 109.33 ft. to a point;

N 12°-36"-30´ E a distance of 147.41 ft. to an axle found in the intersection of a stonewall, said axle marks the northwest corner of the herein described parcel and the southerly line of lands of Theresa Pierce.

Thence proceeding along the southerly line of said Pierce, marked by a stonewall, in the following courses:

S 74°-45"-45´ E, a distance of 196.54 ft. to a point;

N 89°-09"-45´ E, a distance of 27.37 ft. to a point;

S 85°-43"-30´ of 42.11 ft. to a point;

S 47°-08"-15´ E, a distance of 121.19 ft. to a point;

S 37°-23"-45´ E, a distance of 55.61 ft. to a point;

S 44°-09"-00´ E, a distance of 92.85 ft. to a point;

S 26°-52"-30´ E, a distance of 93.95 ft. to a point;

S 05°-49"-00´ E, a distance of 60.95 ft. to a point;

S 06°-07"-15´ W, a distance of 29.74 ft. to a point;

S 14°-34"-15´ W, a distance of 51.31 ft. to a point;

S 43°-46"-45´ W, a distance of 64.41 ft. to a point;

S 47°-11"-30´ W, a distance of 45.46 ft. to an iron pin set;

Thence continuing along the southerly lines of said Pierce and the southerly lines of lands of Alston Springer a course of S 42°-27"-45´ E, a distance of 150.23 ft. to an iron pin set in the northwesterly line of the aforementioned Rt. 100, said pin marks
the northeasterly corner of the herein described parcel.

Thence proceeding along the northwesterly line of said Rt. 100 a course of S 50°-58"-00´ W, a distance of 206.00 ft. to the iron pin marking the point of beginning.

The above-described parcel contains 7.4 acres of land, more or less.

The above-described land and premises are subject to and benefited by any rights, easements or restrictions as may be of record and are specifically subject to and benefited by Land Use Permit 2S0936-1.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated June 16, 2003.

Executive Order No. 29-35
(No. 09-03) [Transfer of part of Middlebury garage property, located along the Otter Creek, from the Agency of Transportation to the Agency of Natural Resources.

WHEREAS, certain state-owned land (the “Property”) located in the Town of Middlebury, County of Addison and State of Vermont, described more particularly below, presently is under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation has determined the Property to be surplus to its needs; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife desires to obtain jurisdiction and control of the Property for the purposes of habitat protection, wildlife management and perpetual conservation of wetland habitat;

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, James H. Douglas, by the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Transportation to the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, for the above
purposes, jurisdiction and control of the following state-owned land:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Charles F. Rogers by his Warranty Deed dated October 30, 1939, which is recorded in the land records of the Town of Middlebury at Book 46, Page 574, having been received for
record on November 10, 1939. The part to be transferred is more particularly described as follows:

Being a strip of land that lies between the public highway known as Otter Creek Road (Town Highway #19) and the Otter Creek. This strip of land is believed to contain about six-tenths of an acre, more or less.

In aid of the above description, reference may be had to a survey entitled, in part, as follows:

CHARLES F. ROGERS
ELDRIDGE LOT IN MIDDLEBURY
TO
STATE OF VERMONT
Scale:
1´ = 50"

A copy of this survey is on file in the property records of VTrans’ Division of Operations, located in Montpelier, Vermont.

The remaining portion of the former Rogers property, located easterly of Otter Creek Road (Town Highway #19) shall remain under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation.

This executive order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated June 12, 2003.

Executive Order No. 29-36
(No. 07-06) [Transfer of Certain Easements and Rights in Middlesex from the Agency of Natural Resources to the Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain easements and/or rights on land hereinafter described and located in the Town of Middlesex, County of Washington, and State of Vermont are presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources,
Department of Environmental Conservation; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires the use of said easements and/or rights on lands for its purposes in connection with the construction of Highway Project Middlesex BRF 0241 (32).

NOW THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Transportation jurisdiction and control over certain easements and/or rights on land of the Agency
of Natural Resources, Department of Environmental Conservation for its purposes, said easements and/or rights being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by the following instruments:

Warranty Deed from John A. Forbes and Sarah V. Forbes dated April 17, 1986, which is recorded in Book 21, Page 42; and

Warranty Deed from Albert J. LaChapelle and Mattie K. LaChapelle dated July 22, 1933, which is recorded in Book 20, Page 163, both of the land records of the Town of Middlesex and being more particularly described as follows:

Being Parcels #1A, 1B and 1C, consisting of easements and/or rights on land as shown on Pages 15, 16 and 17 of the plans for Highway Middlesex BRF 0241 (32) (“the Highway Project”) as filed on the 30th day of November, 2005 in the office of the clerk
of the Town of Middlesex.

In connection with the above parcels, the following easements are conveyed:

Temporary easements during the period of construction to enter upon land of the grantor, for construction purposes, including, but not limited to, the right to cut and dispose of all trees, stubs, brush, bushes and debris and down timber; install erosion
control barriers and project demarcation fence as necessary; and undertake general construction functions; in an area of 191.8 square meters (2,064 square feet), more or less, located left of and between approximate stations 2000+004.28
and 2000+067.93; in an area of 272.7 square meters (2,935 square feet), more or less, located right of and between approximate stations 1999+998.42 and 2000+068.24; in an area of 278.7 square meters (3,000 square feet), more or less,
located right of and between approximate stations 2000+086.08 and 2000+211.64; and in an area of 382.8 square meters (4,006 square feet), more or less, located left of and between approximate stations 2000+084.67 and 2000+208.26; all
stations are of the established centerline of the Highway Project.

Permanent easements to extend and maintain highway slopes and embankments in areas of 44.8 square meters (482 square feet), more or less, 17.5 square meters (188 square feet), more or less, 331.9 square meters (3,573 square feet), more or less, and 258.1
square meters (2,778 square feet), more or less, as shown on the aforesaid Highway Project plans. The right to install temporary erosion control barriers may be included within the permanent slope easements as noted on the project
plans, together with the right to keep the erosion control barriers clear of debris and functioning properly throughout the construction of the project.

The slopes and embankments may be extended at such an angle as will hold the material of said slopes in repose against ordinary erosion, in accordance with the standard practice of highway construction. The State of Vermont shall have the right to remove
all trees, logs, stumps, protruding roots, brush, duff, and other objectionable materials, structures, growth, and any other thing of whatever kind or nature from said slope areas.

A temporary easement, in an area of 0.12 hectare (0.30 acre), more or less, to enter upon land of the grantor during the period of construction to construct and use a temporary two-way vehicular detour, right of and between approximate stations 2000+010.55
and 2000+142.74 of the established centerline of the Highway Project.

Temporary easements to enter upon land of the grantor, during the period of construction to construct a wildlife path; in an area of 3.4 square meters (37 square feet), more or less, right of and between approximate stations 2000+060.94 and 2000+064.95;
in an area of 0.5 square meters (5 square feet), more or less, right of and between approximate stations 2000+091.07 and 2000+092.84; and in an area of 1.5 square meters (16 square feet), more or less, left of and between approximate
stations 2000+087.87 and 2000+090.76; all stations are of the established centerline of the Highway Project.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated October 30, 2006.